Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. General Relief Assistance.

Administrative Code. —

For general relief, see 7 AAC 47.

Sec. 47.25.120.
Eligibility for assistance.

Financial assistance may be given under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

, so far as practicable under the conditions in this state, to a needy person who is eligible under the regulations of the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1957)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

Sec. 47.25.130.
Amount and type of assistance.

The amount of assistance for a needy person shall be determined by the department with regard to the resources and needs of the person and the conditions existing in each case. Where possible, assistance shall be sufficient to provide the applicant with reasonable subsistence according to standards of assistance established by the department. However, the amount of assistance for subsistence needs may not exceed $120 a person a calendar month.

The department may enter into competitively awarded group service agreements with providers, and may require needy persons under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

to obtain services from these designated providers.

History.

(§ 3 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1985; am § 11 ch 105 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Sec. 47.25.140.
Residents of public institutions.

Payment under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

may not be made to or on behalf of an individual who is a resident of a public institution, except as a patient in a public medical institution, or an individual who is a patient in a public or private institution for tuberculosis or mental disease. A resident of a public institution who is otherwise eligible to receive an allowance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

may apply for the allowance instead of the support and maintenance provided in the public institution.

In this section, “public institution” does not include the Alaska Pioneers’ Home or the Alaska Veterans’ Home.

History.

(§ 4 ch 110 SLA 1953; am §§ 12, 13 ch 59 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “a public institution” for “the Alaska Pioneers’ Home or other public institution” in each sentence of subsection (a), added subsection (b), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 47.25.150.
Application for assistance.

A person requesting assistance shall apply for it, either personally or through another person, upon forms furnished and under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 5 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

Sec. 47.25.160.
Investigation of applicant.

The department shall promptly investigate each applicant to determine the applicant’s eligibility.

History.

(§ 6 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

Sec. 47.25.170.
Granting of assistance.

Upon the completion of its investigation, the department shall decide whether the applicant is eligible for and should receive assistance promptly under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

, the amount of assistance, the manner of paying or providing it, and the date on which the assistance shall begin.
The department shall notify the applicant of its decision.

History.

(§ 7 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Sec. 47.25.180.
Appeal.

An applicant whose application is not acted upon or is denied, discontinued, or modified by the department shall be granted an opportunity for fair hearing before the office of the administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

). The hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after demand for it. The conduct of the hearing shall be governed by the regulations adopted for that purpose by the department.

History.

(§ 8 ch 110 SLA 1953; am E.O. No. 116, § 8 (2012))

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in the first sentence, substituted “the office of the administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “a representative of the department appointed for that purpose”; in the second sentence, substituted “The conduct of” for “A representative designated to conduct”.

Collateral references. —

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in public welfare proceedings. 88 ALR4th 1094.

Sec. 47.25.190.
Payment to guardians.

When a guardian is appointed by the court for a person receiving assistance, the department may pay the assistance to the guardian.

History.

(§ 9 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Sec. 47.25.195.
Payment to facilities for treatment of needy persons.

The department may make payments to a health facility for the treatment of a needy person.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, a health facility receiving a payment under this chapter is subject to the requirements of AS

47.07.070

—

47.07.075

.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, if insufficient money is appropriated to fund medical assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

when taking into consideration projected use and the health facility payment rates established in accordance with (b) of this section, the department may, by regulation, establish at any time in the fiscal year a prospective pro rata reduction of the facilities’ established payment rates that will be paid by the department for services provided by facilities under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, the department may enter into agreements with a facility to provide services at a payment rate lower than the rate established in accordance with (b) of this section, except that the department may not enter into an agreement with an assisted living home to provide services at a daily reimbursement rate lower than $70.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section and the provisions of AS 47.07, if the assistance provided to a needy person under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

includes the initiation or continuation of placement of the person in an assisted living home at the state’s expense, the department’s minimum daily reimbursement rate to the assisted living home for the person is $70. This minimum rate is not subject to reduction under (c) of this section. The department may, under its regulations and under the procedures of AS

47.07.070

—

47.07.075

, provide for a daily rate higher than $70 if the care provided to the needy person in the assisted living home justifies the higher reimbursement. A daily rate higher than $70 for assisted living homes may be reduced under (c) of this section, but not below $70.

For purposes of this section,

“assisted living home” means an assisted living home licensed under AS 47.32;

“health facility” includes a hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, rehabilitation facility, inpatient psychiatric facility, home health agency, rural health clinic, and outpatient surgical clinic.

History.

(§ 7 ch 95 SLA 1983; am § 12 ch 105 SLA 1986; am §§ 7 — 13 ch 83 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 21 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

The subsections of this section were relettered in 1990; in 2000 subsection (f) was relettered as (e) and former subsection (e) was relettered as (f) and internal references in (b) and (c) were conformed to the relettering.

Cross references. —

For applicability provisions relating to the 2000 addition of subsection (e) (enacted as (f)) by sec. 11,
ch. 83, SLA 2000, and the 2001 and 2002 amendments of that subsection by secs. 12 and 13,
ch. 83, SLA 2000, see sec. 14,
ch. 83, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in paragraph (f)(1).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (f)(2), substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”.

Sec. 47.25.200.
Review of eligibility.

Assistance grants under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

shall be reviewed by the department as frequently as it considers necessary, and the amount of assistance may be changed or entirely withdrawn if the review of the circumstances warrants this action.

History.

(§ 10 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska senior assistance program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 5.

Sec. 47.25.205.
Priority of general relief medical assistance.

If the department finds that the cost of medical assistance for all persons eligible under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

will exceed the amount allocated in the state budget for that assistance for the fiscal year, the department shall eliminate coverage for medical services in the following order:

treatment of speech, hearing, and language disorders;

optometrists’ services and eyeglasses;

occupational therapy;

emergency dental services for adults;

prosthetic devices not including dentures;

medical supplies and equipment;

physical therapy;

outpatient laboratory and outpatient x-ray services;

ambulatory surgical center services;

nonemergency medical transportation;

outpatient physician services;

outpatient hospital services;

intermediate care facility services;

skilled nursing facility services;

emergency medical transportation;

pharmaceuticals;

inpatient physician services;

inpatient hospital services.

History.

(§ 13 ch 105 SLA 1986)

Sec. 47.25.210.
Alienation and attachment.

Assistance granted under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

is inalienable by assignment or transfer and is exempt from garnishment, levy, or execution as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions).

History.

(§ 11 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 8 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 47.25.220.
State’s claim for assistance.

The total amount paid in assistance to a recipient constitutes a claim against the recipient and the recipient’s estate.
On the death of a person receiving assistance, the total amount paid as assistance shall be allowed by the court having jurisdiction over the estate.

History.

(§ 12 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Sec. 47.25.230.
Persons liable for support and burial.

Every needy person shall be supported while living and upon dying, shall be given a decent burial by the spouse, children, parents, grandparents, grandchildren, or siblings of the needy person, if they, or any of them, have the ability to do so, in the order named.
Every designated person who fails to support the needy person when directed by the department to do so, or fails to give the needy person a decent burial shall reimburse the state or a municipality for the funds expended by either the state or a municipality for the relief or burial of the needy person, and these sums with interest and costs may be recovered by the state or a municipality of the state in a civil action.

History.

(§ 13 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 68 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For duty of parent and child to maintain each other, see AS

25.20.030

.

Sec. 47.25.240.
Action against person liable for care of recipient.

If, during the continuance of an allowance, the department ascertains that a person liable for the support of the recipient of assistance is able to provide the necessary care and support of the recipient, and the person liable for the care and support of the recipient fails or refuses to support and care for the recipient, the state has a claim for the assistance against the person liable for it.
This claim may be enforced by civil action brought in the name of the state by the attorney general against the person liable for the recovery of the amount of money, with interest, paid to the recipient, together with the costs and disbursements of the action.

History.

(§ 14 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Sec. 47.25.250.
Temporary relief.

When a needy person is not entitled to assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

and has no relatives in the state liable for support under AS

47.25.230

and

47.25.240

, the needy person may receive temporary assistance in the form and amount which the department considers necessary. Temporary assistance for needs other than transportation and medical care may not exceed $120 per person per month.

History.

(§ 15 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 4 ch 221 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1985)

Sec. 47.25.252.
Discretionary assistance.

When a needy person is not entitled to assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

, the needy person may receive assistance in the form and amount that the department considers necessary.

History.

(§ 14 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Sec. 47.25.255.
Catastrophic illness. [Repealed, § 2 ch 107 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 47.08.]

Sec. 47.25.260.
Recovery and disposition of allowances improperly granted.

If the department finds that a general relief allowance has been improperly granted, it shall investigate, and if it appears from the investigation that the assistance was improperly granted, the department may cancel the allowance and notify the recipient of the cancellation.
The state then has a claim against the person who received the improper allowance.
The claim may be enforced by civil action in the name of the state by the attorney general to recover the amount paid to the person, with interest, together with the necessary costs of the action.

History.

(§ 16 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Sec. 47.25.265.
Cancellation of disbursements.

Disbursements issued to a general relief assistance recipient after the date of death of the recipient shall be canceled.

General relief assistance disbursements made before the death of the recipient but not collected by the recipient before death shall be canceled, unless claimed by the authorized representative of the estate of the recipient within 90 days after the date of death.

The state is not liable to the estate, heirs, or creditors of the deceased general relief assistance recipient for payment on disbursements canceled under (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 1964; am § 28 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2006, rewrote this section.

Sec. 47.25.270.
Agreements with federal government.

The department may enter into agreements, arrangements, or contracts with any federal agency, department, or official under which funds made available to the federal agency, department, or official may be transferred to the department and spent in accordance with AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

for assistance to needy persons.

History.

(§ 18 ch 110 SLA 1953)

Sec. 47.25.280.
Obtaining assistance by fraud. [Repealed, § 42 ch 143 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 47.25.290.
Penalty for violation.

A person who violates a provision of AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 19 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 1975)

Sec. 47.25.300.
Definitions.

In AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

,

“assistance” means financial assistance to or on behalf of a needy person, including subsistence (food, shelter, fuel, clothing, and utilities) and transportation, medical needs (including, but not limited to, hospitalization, nursing, and convalescent care), burial, and other determined needs;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“needy person” means a needy resident of the state who is not eligible for aid from another public agency or department providing similar services in the state;

“public medical institution” means a public hospital or medical institution, except an institution for the treatment of tuberculosis or mental disease.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Secs. 47.25.301 — 47.25.420.
Aid to Families with Dependent Children Act. [Repealed, §§ 48, 49, 59 ch 107 SLA 1996.]

Revisor’s notes. —

Under §§ 48, 49, and 59, ch. 107, SLA 1996, AS

47.25.301

— 47.25.420 were repealed effective July 1, 1997. Under §§ 47 and 60, ch. 107, SLA 1996, AS 47.25.310(c) was repealed effective February 1, 1997. Under §§ 2-4 and 60, ch. 107, SLA 1996, effective February 1, 1997, AS 47.25.311, 47.25.315, and 47.25.320(h) and (i) were added and AS 47.25.360 was amended; these sections and subsections were then repealed effective July 1, 1997.

Secs. 47.25.421 — 47.25.429.
Job Opportunity and Basic Skills Program. [Repealed, § 49 ch 107 SLA 1996.]